Georgia, session 2025_26, SB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 10 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Georgia
Board of Health Care Workforce, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"49-10-8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Licensed health care professional' means the following health care professionals
licensed or certified by a state licensing board:
S. B. 131
- 1 -

LC 55 0520S (SCS)
(A) Physicians, acupuncturists, physician assistants, respiratory care professionals,
clinical perfusionists, orthotists, prosthetists, cosmetic laser practitioners, and genetic
counselors;
(B) Pharmacists and pharmacy technicians;
(C) Dentists and dental hygienists;
(D) Chiropractors;
(E) Optometrists;
(F) Occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants;
(G) Physical therapists and physical therapist assistants;
(H) Audiologists and speech-language pathologists;
(I) Psychologists;
(J) Licensed practical nurses, registered professional nurses, and advanced practice
registered nurses, including certified nurse midwives, nurse practitioners, certified
registered nurse anesthetists, and clinical nurse specialists in psychiatric/mental health;
(K) Emergency medical technicians, paramedics, and cardiac technicians;
(L) Podiatrists;
(M) Dietitians; and
(N) Professional counselors, social workers, and marriage and family therapists.
(2) 'State licensing board' means:
(A) Georgia Composite Medical Board;
(B) State Board of Pharmacy;
(C) Georgia Board of Dentistry;
(D) Georgia Board of Chiropractic Examiners;
(E) State Board of Optometry;
(F) State Board of Occupational Therapy;
(G) State Board of Physical Therapy;
(H) State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology;
S. B. 131
- 2 -

LC 55 0520S (SCS)
(I) State Board of Examiners of Psychologists;
(J) Georgia Board of Nursing;
(K) Department of Public Health;
(L) State Board of Podiatry Examiners;
(M) Georgia Board of Examiners of Licensed Dietitians; and
(N) Georgia Composite Board of Professional Counselors, Social Workers, and
Marriage and Family Therapists.
(b) In collaboration with state licensing boards, the board shall create and maintain the
Georgia Health Care Professionals Data System for the purposes of collecting and
disseminating nonidentifying descriptive data on licensed health care professionals in this
state. The board shall compile existing information on licensed health care professionals
into a single repository of information easily accessible to the public from the board's
website. The data system shall provide information to the public regarding the
demographics and geographical distribution of licensed health care professionals in this
state. The data system shall contain no individually identifying information regarding any
licensed health care professional.
(c) State licensing boards shall provide the data specified in subsection (d) of this Code
section upon request by the board or up to two times annually as required by the board.
The board shall work with state licensing boards regarding the manner, form, and content
for the reporting of such data. The board shall be authorized to enter into memoranda of
agreement with individual state licensing boards for purposes of data transmission criteria
pursuant to this Code section.
(d) State licensing boards shall provide the following data to the board for its licensed
health care professionals who are in active practice:
(1) Age;
(2) Gender;
(3) Proficiency in English and other languages;
S. B. 131
- 3 -

LC 55 0520S (SCS)
(4) Location of practice; and
(5) License type.
(e) The board shall be authorized to seek federal or other sources of funding necessary to
support the creation and maintenance of the Georgia Health Care Professionals Data
System."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 131
- 4 -